Utah statutes.
20A-11-205.   State office candidate -- Financial reporting requirements -- Termination of duty to report.

(1)  Each state office candidate and the candidate's personal campaign committee is active and subject to interim reporting requirements until:

(a)  the candidate withdraws or is eliminated in a convention or primary; or

(b)  if seeking appointment as a midterm vacancy state office candidate:

(i)  the political party liaison fails to forward the person's name to the governor; or

(ii)  the governor fails to appoint the person to fill the vacancy.

(2)  Each state office candidate and the candidate's personal campaign committee is active and subject to year-end summary reporting requirements until the candidate has filed a statement of dissolution with the lieutenant governor stating that:

(a)  the state office candidate or the personal campaign committee is no longer receiving contributions and is no longer making expenditures;

(b)  the ending balance on the last summary report filed is zero and the balance in the separate bank account required in Section 20A-11-201 is zero; and

(c)  a final summary report in the form required by Section 20A-11-203 showing a zero balance is attached to the statement of dissolution.

(3)  A statement of dissolution and a final summary report may be filed at any time.

(4)  Each state office candidate and the candidate’s personal campaign committee shall continue to file the year-end summary report required by Section 20A-11-203 until the statement of dissolution and final summary report required by this section are filed with the lieutenant governor.



Amended by Chapter 170, 2013 General Session

